test/src/morphology/V-xadasj_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - хадась: # Verb 'to kill' - full paradigm
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хададмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хадан
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хада
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хаданиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хададиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хадаӈахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хадаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хададаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадав
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадар
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадада
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хададиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хададоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадэян
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадэяд
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадэйда
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадэйниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадэйдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадэйдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадэйнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадэйдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадэйдоʼ   
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [хадаманзь, хададамзь]
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хаданась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хаданинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хададинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хадаӈаханзь
#    хадась+V+TV+Dial/W+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хадаханзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хадаваць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хададаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хадаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадавась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадарась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хададась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадаминзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадаринзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хададинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадаваць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадараць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хададонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюнась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадэйнась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадэйдась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадэйдась
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадэйнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадэйдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадэйдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадэйнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадэйдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадэйдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1: хадахадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадахав
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадахахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадахан
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: хадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадад
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадахаюнˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: хаданˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: хадая
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадамда
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдамда
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадэйдамда
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1: хадаханиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадахамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадахахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадаханиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2: хададиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадэйдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3: хадаяхаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадэйдамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1: хадахаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадахаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадахахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадаханаˮ  
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: хададаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадэйдаˮ 
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: хадаяˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадамдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаӈахаюдамдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадэйдамдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: хадаидмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: хадаин
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: хадаи
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: хадаиниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: хадаидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: хадаихиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: хадаиваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: хадаидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: хадаиˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадаив
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадаир
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадаида
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадаимиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадаириʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадаидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадаиваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадаираˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадаидоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадаихиюн
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадаихиюд
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаихиюда
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадаихиюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаихиюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаихиюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадаихиюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаихиюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаихиюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадаин
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадаид
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадаида
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадаиниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадаидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадаидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадаинаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадаидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадаидоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: хадаидамзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: хадаинась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: хадаись
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: хадаининзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: хадаидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: хадаихинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: хадаиваць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: хадаидаць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: хадаиць  
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадаивась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадаирась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадаидась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадаиминзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадаиринзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадаидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадаиваць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадаираць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадаидонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадаихиюнась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадаихиюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадаихиюдась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадаихиюнинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадаихиюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадаихиюдинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадаихиюнаць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадаихиюдаць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадаихиюдонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадаинась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадаидась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадаидась
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадаининзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадаидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадаидинзь
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадаинаць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадаидаць
     хадась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадаидонзь
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: хадабцудмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: хадабцун
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: хадабцу
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: хадабцуниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: хадабцудиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: хадабцухуʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: хадабцуваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: хадабцудаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: хадабцуˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадабцув
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадабцур
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадабцуда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадабцумиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадабцуриʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадабцудиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадабцуваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадабцураˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадабцудоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадабцухуюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадабцухуюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадабцухуюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадабцухуюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадабцухуюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадабцухуюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадабцухуюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадабцухуюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадабцухуюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадабцун
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадабцуд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадабцуда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадабцуниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадабцудиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадабцудиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадабцунаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадабцудаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадабцудоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1: хадасадмʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2: хадасан
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3: хадаса
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1: хадасаниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2: хадасадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3: хадасахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1: хадасаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2: хадасадаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3: хадасаˮ  
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадасав
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадасар
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадасада
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадасамиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадасариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадасадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадасаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадасараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадасадоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадасахаюн
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадасахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадасахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадасахаюниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадасахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадасахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадасахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадасахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадасахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадасян
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадасяд
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадасяда
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадасяниʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадасядиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадасядиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадасянаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадасядаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадасядоʼ      
     хадась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: хадавэдмʼ
